California statutes. Fish and Game Code
 Modoc National Forest boundary on the center line of Sec. 33, T. 41 N., R. 14 E.; thence north along said national forest boundary to Parker Creek, the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 186.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10822.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 1F: All that area within the County of Lassen within the following boundaries:

Beginning at the fork of the Puls Camp Road and the Poison Lake-Harvey Valley Road near the quarter section corner between Secs. 33 and 34, T. 33 N., R. 8 E.; thence northerly following the westerly side of said road by Dixie Springs and Puls Camp in Sec. 33, T. 34 N., R. 8 E., to Shroder Lake in Sec. 19, T. 34 N., R. 8 E.; thence southwesterly about one mile to the junction of said Puls Camp Road and the Little Valley Road in Sec. 24, T. 34 N., R. 7 E.; thence northwesterly following the southerly side of said Little Valley Road to its junction with the Blacks Lake Road; thence westerly following the southerly side of said Blacks Lake Road to the
 Eldridge place in Sec. 13, T. 34 N., R. 6 E.; thence southerly following the easterly side of said road to Jelly Camp in Sec. 25, T. 34 N., R. 6 E.; thence southeasterly following the easterly side of the Susanville-Pittville Road to junction of the Poison Lake-Harvey Valley Road; thence easterly following the northerly side of said Poison Lake-Harvey Valley Road to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 187.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10823.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 1G: All that area within the County of Tehama within the following boundaries:

Beginning at a point where Deer Creek crosses the west township line of T. 25 N., R. 2 E.; thence north along said township line and along the west township line of T. 26 N., R. 2 E. to its intersection with Boatgunwale Creek; thence down Boatgunwale Creek to Mill Creek; thence up Mill Creek to the Ponderosa Truck Trail; thence following the Ponderosa Truck Trail to its intersection with South Antelope Creek; thence up South Antelope Creek to mouth of the North Fork of South Antelope Creek; thence up the North Fork to its source; thence following Manzanita Cut Trail to the South Fork of Rock Gulch Creek; thence down Rock Gulch Creek to its intersection
 with the Old Butte Meadows-Round Valley Trail; thence following the Old Butte Meadows-Round Valley Trail to its intersection with the Deer Creek Highway, thence down the Deer Creek Highway to its westerly crossing of Deer Creek, thence down Deer Creek to point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 188.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10824.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 1H: All that area within the County of Plumas within the following boundaries:

Beginning at a point on the Western Pacific Railway known as Quincy Junction; thence following northerly the westerly side of the Old Road to Taylorsville; thence westerly along the southerly side of the County Road 207 to its intersection with the Western Pacific Railway from Crescent Mills to Keddie; thence southwesterly and southerly along these tracks to Keddie; thence southerly and southeasterly along main Western Pacific tracks from Keddie to Quincy Junction to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 189.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10825.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 1I: All that area within the County of Placer within the following boundaries:

Beginning at a point in Sec. 17, T. 14 N., R. 14 E., M.D.M., where the French House-Big Meadows Road intersects the South Fork of Long Canyon Creek; thence following southwesterly along said road to its intersection with the French Meadows-Georgetown Road near the section line between Secs. 22 and 23, T. 14 N., R. 13 E., thence southwesterly along the French Meadows-Georgetown Road where it intersects an unnamed tributary to the North Fork of Long Canyon Creek near the section line between Secs. 22 and 27, T. 14 N., R. 13 E.; thence northwesterly along said tributary to French House Site (near the center of Sec. 22, T. 14 N., R. 13 E.); thence
 northwesterly along the French House-Red Star Mine Jeep Road in Secs. 22 and 15, T. 14 N., R. 13 E., to its intersection with the Middle Fork of the American River, in Sec. 15, T. 14 N., R. 13 E.; thence northeasterly along the Middle Fork of the American River, to its intersection with the southern boundary of Sec. 35, T. 15 N., R. 13 E., thence due north on a line through the center of Sec. 35 to an intersection with the summit of Red Star Ridge in Sec. 26, T. 15 N., R. 13 E. (this being the divide between Duncan Creek and the Middle Fork of the American River); thence northeasterly following the summit of Red Star Ridge to a point in Sec. 4, T. 15 N., R. 14 E. where said ridge intersects the main Foresthill Divide between the North Fork of the American River and the Middle Fork of the American River; thence easterly along the summit of said divide to Needle Peak; thence southerly following the summit of the divide to Mt. Mildred; thence southwesterly following the summit of the divide between Gray Horse
 Creek and the Middle Fork of the American River to its intersection with the Big Meadows-Gray Horse Valley Trail (near the middle of Sec. 5, T. 14 N., R. 14 E.); thence following said trail to the South Fork of Long Canyon Creek (near the middle of Sec. 9, T. 14 N., R. 14 E.); thence southwesterly down the South Fork Long Canyon Creek to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 190.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10826.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 1J: All that area within the County of Amador within the following boundaries:

Beginning at a point between Secs. 13 and 18, T. 8 N., R. 14 and 15 E., where the Carson Pass Highway (State Sign Route 88) enters Sec. 18, T. 8 N., R. 15 E.; thence northeasterly along the south side of State Highway 88 right of way to the Bear River Road in Section 12, T. 8 N., R. 15 E.; thence southeasterly along the westerly side of said road to the junction of the Ham’s Spring and Cole Creek Roads in Section 20, T. 8 N., R. 16 E.; thence southeasterly along the westerly side of the Cole Creek Road to its termination at the P. G. & E. penstock in Section 33, T. 8 N., R. 16 E.; thence southerly along the westerly side of said penstock to its
 intersection with the Mokelumne River; thence down the north bank of the Mokelumne River in a southwesterly direction to the intersection of range line between T. 7 N., R. 14 and 15 E.; thence north along range line between T. 8 N., R. 14 and 15 E., to the intersection of State Sign Route 88 to the place of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 191.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10827.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 1N: All that area within the Counties of Siskiyou and Modoc within the following boundaries:

Beginning at the junction of the Lava Ranger Station Road and the Egg Lake-Quaking Asp Road, thence following westerly and northerly the northerly and easterly side of said Lava Ranger Station Road to its junction with the Medicine Lake-Quaking Asp Road near the northwest corner of Sec. 18, T. 42 N., R. 5 E., thence easterly and southerly following the southerly and westerly side of the Medicine Lake-Quaking Asp-Egg Lake Road to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 192.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10828.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 1P: All that area within the County of Plumas, within the following boundaries:

Beginning at the junction of the Milford-Beckwourth Road and the Last Chance-Doyle Road, thence following the easterly side of said Milford-Beckwourt h Road to its junction with the Dixie Valley-Frenchman’s Cove Road; thence following the easterly side of the Dixie Valley-Frenchman’s Cove Road to its junction with the Little Last Chance Road; thence following the westerly side of the Little Last Chance Road to its junction with the Last Chance-Doyle Road; thence following the westerly side of the Last Chance-Doyle Road to the place of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 193.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10829.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 1R: All that area within the County of Tuolumne within the following boundaries:

Beginning at the junction of the North Fork of the Stanislaus River and the Middle Fork of the Stanislaus River; thence easterly following the northerly bank of said Middle Fork of the Stanislaus River to the mouth of the Shu-fly Creek, approximately in Sec. 9, T. 5 N., R. 18 E.; thence northerly following the westerly bank of said creek to its junction with Whit’s Basin Creek; thence westerly following the southerly and westerly bank of said Whit’s Basin Creek to its junction with the Sands Meadow Trail in Sec. 36, T. 6 N., R. 17 E.; thence northwesterly following said Sands Meadow Trail to its junction with the Government Truck Trail in Sec. 23, T. 6
 N., R. 17 E.; thence westerly following said Truck Trail to Liberty Hill; thence following said Government Truck Trail westerly and southerly to its junction with the Boards Crossing-Beaver Creek Camp Road; thence northerly following said Boards Crossing-Beaver Creek Camp Road to Boards Crossing on the North Fork of the Stanislaus River; thence downstream following the easterly bank of said North Fork of the Stanislaus River to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 194.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10830.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 1S: All that area lying within the County of Lassen within the following boundaries:

Beginning at the old Haydenhill Post Office in the approximate center of Sec. 36, T. 37 N., R. 9 E.; thence following westerly along the old Juniper Road through Windmill Flat to the junction of the Summit Spring Road near Meyers Spring; thence south through Lost Valley along the Lost Valley-Dixie Valley Road to the junction of the Dixie Valley-Grasshopper Road; thence east to the junction of the old Haydenhill-Slate Creek Road located approximately in Sec. 24, T. 35 N., R. 9 E.; thence north along the Haydenhill-Slate Creek Road to the place of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 195.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10831.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 1V: All that area within the County of Plumas within the following boundaries:

Beginning at the intersection of U. S. Alternate 40 Highway and U. S. Forest Service Road 24N12; thence following northerly the easterly side of U. S. Forest Service Road 24N12 to its intersection with U. S. Forest Service Road 24N10; thence easterly following the southerly side of U. S. Forest Service Road 24N10 to its intersection with U. S. Forest Service Road 24N07 (Relocated); thence easterly following the southerly side of U. S. Forest Service Road 24N07 (Relocated) to its intersection with U. S. Forest Service Road 25N08; thence southerly on the westerly side of U. S. Forest Service Road 25N08 to its intersection with U. S. Alternate 40 Highway;
 thence westerly along the northerly side of U. S. Alternate 40 Highway to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 196.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10832.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 2A: All that area within the Counties of Mendocino, Lake, and Glenn within the following boundaries:

Beginning at the summit of Hull Mountain in Mendocino County, in the southwest corner of Sec. 2, T. 19 N., R. 10 W.; thence in a northeasterly direction down Hull Creek (sometimes known as Red Rock Creek) to its junction with Sand Creek; thence southeasterly down Sand Creek to its junction with Corbin Creek, thence in an easterly direction up Corbin Creek to Sec. 36, T. 20 N., R. 8 W.; thence in a southerly direction up a ravine to the Pacific Crest Road (24N02) on the summit of the Coast Range Mountains in Sec. 12, T. 19 N., R. 8 W.; thence southwesterly along the Pacific Crest Road (24N02) to Low Gap, where the Bloody Rock trail
 crosses the summit in Sec. 27, T. 19 N., R. 8 W.; thence in a westerly direction down the Bloody Rock trail and Cold Creek to South Eel River in Sec. 26, T. 19 N., R. 9 W.; thence down the river to the mouth of a ravine in the SE 14 of Sec. 27, T. 19 N., R. 9 W.; thence in a northwesterly direction up the ravine through Secs. 27 and 28 to the summit of Boardman Ridge; thence in a northwesterly direction up Boardman Ridge to the summit of Hull Mountain to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 197.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10833.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 2B, the Mount Tamalpais Game Refuge: All that area within the County of Marin within the following boundaries:

Beginning at the intersection of the easterly shore of inner Bolinas Bay with the northwesterly boundary line extended, of the Stinson ranch conveyed to A. H. Stinson et al., by decree of distribution dated the 28th of July, 1911; thence northwesterly along the said northwesterly boundary line to the southwesterly boundary line of the lands of the Marin municipal water district on the crest of Bolinas Ridge; thence northeasterly, northwesterly, and easterly along the westerly and northerly boundary line of the watershed lands of the said water district to its intersection with the southwesterly corner of the Rancho Canada
 de Herrera; thence north 14 degrees west along the westerly line of said Rancho Canada de Herrera to the southwesterly corner of the Bothin real estate property; thence in an easterly direction along the southerly line of the said Bothin property to its intersection with the westerly boundary line of the town of Fairfax; thence in a general southerly direction along the westerly boundary of the said town of Fairfax to its intersection with the southerly boundary line of the said Rancho Canada de Herrera; thence northerly 83 degrees 15 minutes east along said southerly line 3,200 feet, more or less, to its intersection with the southeasterly line of the county road leading from Fairfax to Bolinas; thence northerly along said road and along the Fairfax-Bolinas County Road to a point in the southerly line of the right of way of the Northwestern Pacific Railroad Company near Fairfax station; thence along the said last-mentioned line in a southerly direction following the westerly line of said railroad right of
 way to its intersection with the southerly line of the road or highway immediately south of Alto station; thence following the southerly side of said Alto-Belvedere Road and state highway easterly to its intersection with the northwesterly line of the Town of Belvedere; thence following the northwesterly line of the Town of Belvedere southwesterly to its extreme westerly corner; thence in a direct line to the extreme northerly corner of the Town of Sausalito; thence southwesterly along the northwesterly line of the Town of Sausalito to its intersection with the Northwestern Pacific Railroad; thence following the westerly line of the right of way of the Northwestern Pacific railroad to Manzanita Station; thence southwesterly in a direct line to the Mill Valley State Highway; thence westerly along the said highway to its intersection with Tennessee Avenue; thence following the southerly and easterly line of Tennessee Avenue, westerly and southerly, to the corner common to ranches E, F, and A, as said ranches
 are delineated on the Tamalpais Land and Water Company’s map No. 3; thence southwesterly along the southeasterly boundary lines of ranches E, L, and K, as shown on the said last-mentioned map, to the shore of the Pacific Ocean; thence northwesterly along the shore of the Pacific Ocean and across the easterly end of the Bolinas sandspit, and along the easterly shore of inner Bolinas Bay, to the point of beginning, excepting from the area of said Mount Tamalpais Game Refuge all lands lying within incorporated areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 198.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10835.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 3F: All that area within the County of Contra Costa described as follows:

All of Secs. 29, 30, 31 and 32, T. 1 N., R. 1 E.; all of Secs. 5, 6, 7 and 8, T. 1 S., R. 1 E.; all of Secs. 25, 26, 35 and 36 of T. 1 N., R. 1 W.; all of Secs. 1, 2, 11 and 12 of T. 1 S., R. 1 W.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 199.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10836.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 3G:

All those lands of the Leland Stanford Junior University within the Counties of San Mateo and Santa Clara, and consisting of lots numbers 1 to 33, inclusive; that portion of lots 35 and 42 lying outside of the town limits of the town of Mayfield; lots 36, 43, 46 to 75, inclusive; 80 to 86, inclusive; 89 to 98, inclusive, as shown on the map entitled “map of the lands of the Leland Stanford Junior University at or near the site of the university in the Counties of Santa Clara and San Mateo, by A. T. and F. A. Herrmann of Herrmann Bros.,” dated November, 1908, recorded in the Office of the County Recorder of the County of Santa Clara.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 200.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10837.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 4D: All that area within the County of Riverside described as follows:

Beginning at the intersection of State Highway 74 and Highway 111 in Section 20, T. 5 S., R. 6 E., S.B.B. & M.;

Thence northwesterly on State Highway 111 to its intersection with the south bank of the Palm Canyon wash and the east boundary of Section 25, T. 4 S., R. 4 E. , S.B.B. & M.;

Thence southwesterly and southerly along east bank of Palm Canyon wash through said Section 25, Sections 36 and 35, T. 4 S., R. 4 E., S.B.B. & M. and Sections 2, 11, 14, 23, 25 and 36, T. 5 S., R. 4 E., S.B.B. & M.;

Thence continuing
 along the east bank of said Palm Canyon wash through Sections 1, 12, 13, T. 6 S., R. 4 E., and continuing through Sections 18, 19, 30 and 31, T. 6 S., R. 5 E., to a point of intersection with Omstott Creek;

Thence along the north bank Omstott Creek through Section 31, T. 6 S., R. 5 E., and continuing through Sections 5, 4, 9, 10, T. 7 S., R. 5 E., to the north line of said State Highway 74;

Thence easterly along north line of said Highway 74 to a point of intersection with the north line Section 12, T. 7 S., R. 5 E.;

Thence east along north line of said Section 12 to the northeast corner of said Section 12;

Thence south along the easterly boundary of Sections 12, 13, 24, 25 and 36, T. 7 S., R. 5 E.; and the easterly boundary of Section 1, T. 8 S., R. 5 E., to the point of intersection with the southwesterly corner of Section 31, T. 7 S.,
 R. 6 E.;

Thence east and along the southerly boundary of said Section 31 and Sections 32, 33, 34 and 35, to the southeast corner of Section 36, T. 7 S., R. 6 E.;

Thence north along the easterly boundary of Sections 36, 25, 24, 13 and 12 to the northeast corner of Section 1, T. 7 S., R. 6 E.;

Thence west along the north line of said Section 1 to the southeast corner of Section 36, T. 6 S., R. 6 E.;

Thence north along the east line of said Section 36, Sections 25, 24 and 13 to the southwest corner of Section 7, T. 6 S., R. 7 E.;

Thence east along the south line of said Section 7 to the southeast corner thereof;

Thence north along the east line of said Section 7 and Section 6 of said T. 6 S., R. 7 E., to the northeast corner of said Section 6;

Thence west along the north line of said Section 6 of said T. 6 S., R. 7 E. to Marshall Street;

Thence north along Marshall Street and on the 14 section line of Sections 31 and 30, T. 5 S., R. 7 E. to Highway 111;

Thence westerly along Highway 111 to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 201.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10838.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 4G:

Beginning at the northeast corner of T. 4 S., R. 3 E., S. B. B. & M.;

Thence on section lines, west one mile, north one mile, west two miles, north one mile and west three miles to the northwest corner of Sec. 30, T. 3. S., R. 3 E., S. B. B. & M.;

Thence south on the range line between R. 2 and 3 E., about 734 miles to the crest of the divide forming the northwesterly boundary of Strawberry Creek watershed;

Thence southwesterly along said divide to a point on the northerly boundary of Sec. 28
 in T. 5 S., R. 2 E., S. B. B. & M.;

Thence southwesterly in a straight line to the junction of Strawberry Creek and the south fork of the San Jacinto River;

Thence southeasterly and northeasterly along the crest of the divide between the waters of Dry Creek, a tributary of Strawberry Creek, and the waters of the south fork of the San Jacinto River and its tributaries to the northeasterly side of the right of way of the Pines to Palms Highway;

Thence southeasterly along the said northeasterly side of the right of way of the Pines to Palms Highway to the right bank of Hurkey Creek;

Thence northerly along the right bank of Hurkey Creek through Secs. 9 and 4 in T. 6 S., R. 3 E., and through Secs. 33, 28, 21, the southeast quarter of Sec. 16, the west one-half of Sec. 15, the east half of Sec. 10 and the northwest quarter of Sec. 11 to the
 crest of the divide between the waters of Hurkey Creek and Murray Canyon;

Thence southeasterly along the crest of the divide between the waters flowing west into the San Jacinto River and the waters flowing east into Coachella Valley to a point on the south boundary of Sec. 24 in T. 5 S., R. 3 E., S. B. B. & M.;

Thence east on said south line of Sec. 24 to the southeast corner thereof. Thence north on the range line to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 202.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10840.

The California Sea Otter Game Refuge consists of and includes the following:

All that portion of Monterey and San Luis Obispo Counties between Carmel River on the north and Santa Rosa Creek on the south, lying west of the Monterey-Cambria Pines Highway, also known as California Highway No. 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

10841.

The Preston School of Industry Game Refuge consists of and includes the following:

The Preston School of Industry Reservoir, which is situated on land occupied by the Preston School of Industry, Ione, Amador County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 596.)
-------------------------------------------

10842.

The following constitutes Game Refuge 1K, the Johnsville Game Refuge: All that area within the County of Plumas within the following boundaries:

Beginning at the North 14 corner of Section 24, T. 22 N., R. 11 E., M. D. M.; thence North 89° 39´ 25″ East 334.93 feet; thence South 0° 08´ 47″ East 418.08 feet; thence South 89° 48´ 44″ West 167.37 feet; thence South 0° 09´ 33″ East 668.15 feet; thence South 89° 59´ 48″ West 496.21 feet; thence South 0° 09´ 15″ East 83.34 feet; thence South 89° 58´ 24″ West 164.51 feet; thence South 0° 08´ 41″ East 83.31 feet; thence South 89° 59´ 14″ West 82.26 feet; thence South 0° 08´ 24″ East 83.29 feet; thence North 89° 59´ 55″ West
 82.26 feet; thence South 0° 03´ 55″ East 83.09 feet; thence North 89° 51´ 34″ West 82.43 feet; thence South 0° 03´ 58″ East 83.05 feet; thence North 89° 50´ 14″ West 82.42 feet; thence South 0° 03´ 30″ East 331.95 feet; thence North 89° 46´ 07″ West 329.53 feet; thence North 0° 03´ 37″ West 331.59 feet; thence South 89° 49´ 39″ East 164.68 feet; thence North 0° 04´ 08″ West 165.91 feet; thence North 0° 04´ 47″ West 498.64 feet; thence South 89° 57´ 00″ West 164.57 feet; thence North 0° 04´ 11″ West 184.90 feet; thence North 69° 21´ 49″ East 175.25 feet; thence North 0° 05´ 22″ West 584.25 feet; thence North 89° 43´ 00″ East 985.90 feet to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 203.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10843.

(a) The following constitutes the Farallon Islands Game Refuge: the Southeast Farallons, including Maintop Island, Middle Farallon, the North Farallons, Noonday Rock, and the waters lying around each island within one nautical mile from the coastline of each island.

(b) Section 10513 shall have no application in this refuge.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 10500, persons on commercial vessels may possess unloaded firearms when traveling through the navigable waters of this refuge. Fishermen, however, may not take any seal or sea lion while in this refuge, notwithstanding the provisions of Section
 4500.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 50.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10844.

(a) The department shall undertake appropriate education and outreach regarding the current location of existing game refuges, agency contacts for statutory notices in Sections 10506 and 10507, and the potential closure of all state game refuges, except the California Sea Otter Game Refuge and the Farallon Islands Game Refuge.

(b) The department shall provide an opportunity for public comment concerning the potential elimination of game refuges.

(c) The department shall provide information about game refuge boundaries, including, but not limited to, maps available both on the department’s internet website and in hardcopy format.

(d) The department shall also provide internet website contact information for the public to contact the department in accordance with state law.

(e) The department may conduct regional workshops as it determines to be necessary to provide public information about the proposed elimination of game refuges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 205.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Waterfowl Refuges [10860. - 10861.]

10860.

The area described in this article is a waterfowl refuge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 206.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10861.

The following constitutes a waterfowl refuge and shall be designated the San Leandro Waterfowl Refuge: All the area within the County of Alameda, within the following boundaries:

Beginning at the Bay Farm Island Bridge, in Alameda, thence in a southerly direction, following the levee on westerly side of San Leandro Bay to the Hagenburger Road, thence in a northeasterly direction along said Hagenburger Road to a point where the Pacific Gas and Electric tower line crosses said Hagenburger Road, thence following said Pacific Gas and Electric tower line to the Pacific Gas and Electric substation at the foot of Fiftieth Avenue in Oakland, thence in a westerly direction along the high tide line of San Leandro Bay to the point of beginning.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Quail Refuges [10880. - 10881.]

10880.

The area described in this article is a quail refuge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 207.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10881.

The following constitutes a quail refuge and shall be designated the Bolinas Quail Refuge: All that area within the County of Marin, within the following boundaries:

Beginning at a point on the southeasterly line of the lands of Ludwig B. Freudenthal, as the same is described in Book 158 of official records on page 261, of Marin County records, and at a point which is 20 feet above mean high tide of the Pacific Ocean, and running thence northeasterly and northwesterly along the southeasterly line of said Ludwig B. Freudenthal tract to a point on the southerly line of the “Mesa Road,” thence northeasterly and along the southerly line of Mesa Road to the westerly line of the road leading from the Town of Bolinas to Sausalito, thence southeasterly and along the southerly line of the county road leading through the Town of Bolinas to the landing wharf at the entrance of Bolinas Bay, and 20 feet above mean high tide, thence southwesterly, westerly and northwesterly along a line which is 20 feet above mean high tide to the point of beginning.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Marine Life Refuge [10900. - 10913.]

10900.

The refuges described in the following sections are marine life refuges.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10901.

That portion of District 16 consisting of the land and ocean waters within the following boundaries constitutes a marine life refuge and shall be designated the Hopkins Marine Life Refuge:

Beginning at the point of intersection of the southeasterly corporate limit line of the City of Pacific Grove prolongated, and the line of highest tide of the Bay of Monterey; thence northwesterly along said line of highest tide to the intersection with the northerly extension of the west side of Third Street in said city; thence northerly to a point in said bay where the depth of water is 60 feet measured from the level of mean low tide; thence southeasterly along the line in said bay which line is at a constant depth of 60 feet measured from the level of mean low tide to the intersection with the southeasterly corporate limit line of said city prolongated; thence S. 58° 57´ 45″ W. along said southeasterly corporate limit line prolongated to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1069, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

10902.

The following constitutes a marine life refuge and shall be designated the San Diego Marine Life Refuge:

That portion of District 19 consisting of that certain strip of land lying between the westerly edge of Pueblo Lot No. 1298 of the pueblo lands of the City of San Diego, according to the official map of said pueblo lands as made by James Pascoe, and filed in the Office of the County Recorder of said County of San Diego, and the lowest tide line opposite to and west of said pueblo lot, which said strip of land is bounded on the north by the northerly boundary line of said pueblo lot extended westerly and on the south by the southerly boundary line of said pueblo lot extended westerly; together with the state waters of the State of California adjacent thereto, being those state waters which lie between said extended northerly and southerly boundaries of said pueblo lot and extend westerly from said lowest low tide line for a distance of 1,000 feet.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10903.

The following constitutes a marine life refuge and shall be designated the Bodega Marine Life Refuge:

That portion of District 10 consisting of that certain parcel of land bounded by the line of Mean High Tide of the Pacific Ocean lying between the northern boundary extended northwesterly and the southern boundary extended southwesterly of the lands of the Regents of the University of California according to the final order of condemnation in Case No. 47,617 in the Superior Court of the State of California in and for the County of Sonoma, recorded in Book 1930, at pages 656 and 659, inclusive, Official Records, Sonoma County, California, and extending into and including the state waters of the State of California for a distance of a thousand feet into the Pacific Ocean from the line of Mean High Tide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1303.)
-------------------------------------------

10904.

The following constitutes a marine life refuge and shall be designated as the Laguna Beach Marine Life Refuge:

That portion of District 19 consisting of that certain parcel of land bounded by a line commencing at the mean high tide of the Pacific Ocean lying on the northern boundary of the City of Laguna Beach and running for a distance of 600 feet into the Pacific Ocean along that boundary, and thence generally southeastward and generally parallel to the shoreline at a distance of approximately 600 feet to the northern boundary of the South Laguna Beach Marine Life Refuge, and thence generally northeastward for a distance of approximately 700 feet to the mean high tide, and thence generally northwestward along the line of mean high tide to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 259, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10905.

The following constitutes a marine life refuge and shall be designated as the Newport Beach Marine Life Refuge:

That portion of District 19 consisting of that certain parcel of land bounded by the line of Mean High Tide of the Pacific Ocean between the eastern boundary of the City of Newport Beach and Poppy Avenue in the City of Newport Beach, and extending into and including the state waters of the State of California for a distance of two hundred feet into the Pacific Ocean from the line of Mean High Tide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 136.)
-------------------------------------------

10906.

The following constitutes a marine life refuge and shall be designated as the South Laguna Beach Marine Life Refuge:

That portion of District 19 consisting of land and ocean waters bounded by a line commencing at the intersection of the line of mean high tide of the Pacific Ocean and a line which bears South 48° 50´ 00″ West from the most westerly point of Lot 75 of Tract No. 702, as that tract is shown on a map recorded in Book 21, pages 1 to 3, Miscellaneous Maps, on file in the Office of the County Recorder of Orange County; thence running South 48° 50´ 00″ West approximately 600 feet to the minus 20 foot mean lower low water contour; thence southeasterly and generally parallel to the shoreline to the northerly boundary of the Niguel Marine Life Refuge; thence North 35° 57´ 06″ East to the line of mean high tide of the Pacific Ocean; thence northwesterly along the line of mean high tide of the Pacific Ocean to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 259, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10907.

The following constitutes a marine life refuge and shall be designated as the Dana Point Marine Life Refuge:

That portion of District 19 consisting of land and ocean waters bounded by a line commencing at Station 70 of the mean high tide line as shown on Document Number 25208 recorded in Book 7651, page 69 of Official Records on file in the Office of County Recorder of Orange County; thence along the mean high tide line westerly and northerly 3500 feet more or less to intersection with a line which is 2440 feet south of and parallel to the north line of Fractional Section 21, R. 8 W., T. 8 S., S.B.M.´; thence west 1200 feet; thence southerly and easterly 1200 feet from and parallel to the shore line to an intersection with a line which bears S 40° 00´ E. from said Station 70; thence N 40° 00´ W. 1200 feet more or less to the point of beginning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

10908.

The following constitutes a marine life refuge and shall be designated as the Doheny Beach Marine Life Refuge:

All that area lying 600 feet seaward of and below the mean high tide line of the Pacific Ocean between the prolongation of the line common to Blocks A and B of Tract No. 797, Capistrano Beach #3, in the County of Orange, State of California, as per map recorded in Book 25, pages 10 to 15, inclusive, of Miscellaneous Maps in the office of the County Recorder of such county, such line also being the prolongation of the easterly line of Doheny State Beach, a unit of the State Park System acquired by deed dated April 29, 1957, from the Union Oil Company of California, recorded on October 9, 1957, in Book 4063 of Official Records at page 88, Orange County, California, and the east breakwater of the Dana Point Harbor, a project of the Orange County Harbor District, a political subdivision of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

10909.

The following constitutes a marine life refuge and shall be designated the James V. Fitzgerald Marine Reserve:

That portion of District 10 consisting of that certain parcel of land bounded by a line commencing at the mean high tide of the Pacific Ocean lying on a line beginning at the northeasterly corner of Lot 8, Block 42 as said Lot and Block are shown on “Map of Moss Beach Heights San Mateo County Cal”, recorded May 4, 1908, in Volume 6 of Maps at page 8, records of San Mateo County; thence North 88° 49´ West along the northerly line of said Lot 8 and its Northwesterly prolongation to the intersection thereof with the Westerly line of that certain tract of land (Parcel No. 1) conveyed to the County of San Mateo for a marine reserve, recorded August 8, 1967, in Volume 5346 Official Records of San Mateo County at page 62 (70483-AA) last mentioned intersection being the shoreline of the Pacific Ocean (ordinary high water) and the true Point of Beginning along the prolongation of the Northerly Line of said Lot 8, North 88° 49´ West, 1000 feet, into the Pacific Ocean and thence generally Southerly and generally parallel to the shoreline for a distance of approximately three statute miles to the extension of a line beginning at the most Southerly terminus of Course No. 15 of the survey of the Rancho Corral de Tierra as shown on a Plat thereof on file in the Office of the Bureau of Land Management, U. S. Department of the Interior; said most Southerly terminus also being distant on said Course No. 15, South 28° 30´ East 269.91 feet from the most Southerly corner of that certain 10.380 acre tract of land conveyed to the United States of America by Deed dated June 18, 1940, recorded October 28, 1940 in Book 918 of Official Records at page 373; running thence from said point of beginning along a line that is the Southwesterly prolongation of Course No. 14 of said survey, South 74° 45´ West to the shoreline of the Pacific Ocean (ordinary high water) and the true point of beginning of the least area herein described; thence from said true point of beginning along the prolongation of said Course No. 14, South 74° 45´ West, 1000 feet into the Pacific Ocean, thence Easterly along said line to the mean high tide line, thence generally Northerly along the line of the mean high tide to the point of beginning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 675.)
-------------------------------------------

10910.

The following constitutes a marine life refuge and shall be designated as the Point Fermin Marine Life Refuge:
